Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1338
Definitions.

In the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act:

(1) Foreign country means a government other than:

(A) the United States;

(B) a state, district, commonwealth, territory, or insular possession of the United States; or

(C) any other government with regard to which the decision in this state as to whether to recognize a judgment of that government's courts is initially subject to determination under the Full Faith and Credit Clause of the United States Constitution.

(2) Foreign-country judgment means a judgment of a court of a foreign country.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 2.